District of Columbia statutes.
32-1408

Apprenticeship agreements — contents.

Every apprenticeship agreement entered into pursuant to this subchapter shall contain:

(1)

The names and signatures of the contracting parties, including the apprentice’s parent or guardian, if the apprentice is a minor, and the contact information of the program sponsor and the Registration Agency:

(2)

The date of birth of the apprentice and the apprentice’s social security number, given on a voluntary basis;

(3)

A statement of the craft or occupation that the apprentice is to be taught and the time period at which the apprenticeship will begin and end;

(4)

A statement showing:

(A)

The number of hours to be spent by the apprentice in on-the-job learning in a time-based program;

(B)

(i)

A description of the skill sets to be attained by completion of a competency-based program, including the on-the-job learning component; or

(ii)

The minimum number of hours to be spent by the apprentice and a description of the skill sets to be attained by completion of a hybrid program; and

(C)

Provisions for related and supplemental instruction;

(5)

A statement setting forth a schedule of the processes in the occupation or industry division in which the apprentice is to be trained and the approximate time to be spent in each process;

(6)

A statement of the graduated scale of wages to be paid the apprentice and whether the required school time shall be compensated;

(7)

A statement providing for a period of probation without adverse impact on the sponsor during which time the apprenticeship agreement shall be terminated by the Associate Director of Apprenticeship at the request, in writing, of the apprentice or suspended or cancelled by the sponsor for good cause with due notice to the apprentice and a reasonable opportunity for corrective action with due notice to the Associate Director of Apprenticeship, and providing that after a probationary period, the apprenticeship may be cancelled by the Associate Director of Apprenticeship by mutual agreement of all parties or canceled by the Associate Director of Apprenticeship for good and sufficient reasons;

(8)

Contact information (name, address, phone, and e-mail, if appropriate) of the person in the Registration Agency designated under the program to receive, process, and make disposition of a controversy of difference arising out of the apprenticeship agreement when the controversy or difference cannot be adjusted locally or resolved in accordance with the established procedure or applicable collective bargaining provisions;

(9)

A provision that a sponsor who is unable to fulfill the obligations under the apprenticeship agreement may, with the approval of the Associate Director of Apprenticeship or under the direction of the joint trade apprenticeship committee or non-joint apprenticeship committee or individual sponsor, transfer the apprenticeship agreement to another sponsor; provided, that:

(A)

The apprentice consents and that the other sponsor agrees to assume the obligations of the apprenticeship agreement;

(B)

The transferring apprentice is provided a transcript of related instruction and on-the-job learning by the program sponsor;

(C)

The transfer is to the same occupation; and

(D)

A new apprenticeship agreement is executed when the transfer between program sponsors occurs; and

(10)

Such additional terms and conditions as may be prescribed or approved by the Registration Agency with the advice and guidance of the Apprenticeship Council, if not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 206, ch. 267, § 8
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(h), 62 DCR 10905
1981 Ed., § 36-410.
1973 Ed., § 36-128.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(h) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).